District of Columbia statutes.
5-119.19

Abandoned intangible personal property.

Nothing in §§ 5-119.01 through 5-119.10 and 5-119.12 through 5-119.18 shall be held to require the Property Clerk to make disposition of any abandoned intangible personal property except as provided for in Chapter 1 of Title 41.

R.S., D.C., § 424a
as added Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-160, § 203, 27 DCR 5150
1981 Ed., § 4-170.